Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2261XS (3) 91 ss/jh S.F. 121 Section 1. Section 618.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Complies with the requirements of 16 3 C.F.R. pt. 425. 4 Sec. 2. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. Upon the effective date of 5 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1019, section 2, the Code editor shall 6 renumber Code section 618.3, subsection 5, as enacted by this 7 Act, as Code section 618.3, subsection 1, paragraph âhâ. 8 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 9 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10